Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB772.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-MCOMMUTER AND COMMERCE TOLL TAX CREDITSection 1701-M. Scope of article.This article relates to the commuter and commerce toll tax credit.Section 1702-M. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Pass-through entity." Any of the following:(1) A partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, business trust or other unincorporated entity that for Federal income tax purposes is taxable as a partnership.(2) A Pennsylvania S corporation."Qualified toll expense." Any remuneration paid through the use of an E-ZPass transponder or paid with cash or a credit or debit card for access and use of the Pennsylvania Turnpike and all toll bridges operated under the Delaware River Joint Toll Bridge Commission, the Delaware River Port Authority of Pennsylvania and New Jersey and the Burlington County Bridge Commission."Tax credit." The Commuter and Commerce Toll Tax Credit authorized under this article."Tax liability." For a taxpayer who is an individual, taxes imposed under Article III and for all other taxpayers, taxes imposed under Articles III and IV. The term shall include the liability for taxes imposed under Article III on a shareholder of a pass-through entity."Taxpayer." A Pennsylvania-based entity or individual Pennsylvania resident subject to tax under Article III or IV. The term shall include the shareholder, owner or member of a pass-through entity that receives a tax credit.Section 1703-M. Credit for qualified toll expense.(a) Application.--A taxpayer that incurs a qualified toll expense in a taxable year may apply for a tax credit as provided 20250SB0772PN0826 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this article. By September 15 of each year, a taxpayer must submit an application to the department for a qualified toll expense incurred in the taxable year that ended in the prior calendar year.(b) Receipt.--A taxpayer that is qualified under subsection (a) shall receive a tax credit for the taxable year in the amount of 50%, not to exceed $500, of the taxpayer's total qualified toll expense for the taxable year.(c) Notification.--By December 15 of the calendar year following the close of the taxable year during which the qualified toll expense was incurred, the department shall notify the taxpayer of the amount of the taxpayer's tax credit approved by the department.Section 1704-M. Limitation on credits.(a) Total amount.--The total amount of tax credits approved by the department may not be limited in any fiscal year.(b) Allocation.--Tax credits to each taxpayer under this article may not exceed $500 annually.Section 1705-M. Shareholder, owner or member pass-through.(a) Application to Pennsylvania S corporations.--If a Pennsylvania S corporation does not have an eligible tax liability against which the tax credit may be applied, a shareholder of the Pennsylvania S corporation shall be entitled to a tax credit equal to the tax credit determined for the Pennsylvania S corporation for the taxable year multiplied by the percentage of the Pennsylvania S corporation's distributive income to which the shareholder is entitled.(b) Other applications.--If a pass-through entity other than a Pennsylvania S corporation does not have an eligible tax liability against which the tax credit may be applied, an owner 20250SB0772PN0826 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or member of the pass-through entity shall be entitled to a tax credit equal to the tax credit determined for the pass-through entity for the taxable year multiplied by the percentage of the pass-through entity's distributive income to which the owner or member is entitled.(c) Additional credit.--The credit provided under subsection (a) or (b) shall be in addition to any tax credit to which a shareholder, owner or member of a pass-through entity is otherwise entitled under this article, except that a pass-through entity and a shareholder, owner or member of a pass-through entity may not claim a credit under this article for the same qualified toll expense.Section 1706-M. Regulations.The department shall promulgate regulations necessary for the implementation and administration of this article.Section 2. The addition of Article XVII-M of the act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0772PN0826 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718